Massachusetts, session 194th, H4349.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, including the provisions of
Chapter 43 of the Acts of 2007, the City of Boston Police Department shall waive the maximum
age requirement for original appointment of police officers for Luis Cabral. If Luis Cabral meets
all other requirements set forth by the Boston Police Department, he shall be eligible to have his
name certified for original appointment to the position of police officer.
SECTION 2.
The provisions of this act are severable and if any provision, or portion thereof, should be
held to be unconstitutional or otherwise invalid by any court of competent jurisdiction, such
of 2

unconstitutionality or invalidity shall not affect the remaining provisions, which remain in full
force and effect.
SECTION 3.
This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2